src/ipk-lex.txt
!=============================================================================== =
!This is the file that hosts the morphology for the Inupiaq morphological parser =
!Rules for phonology and orthography are kept in the rule-file xfst-ipk.txt      =
!=============================================================================== =

Multichar_Symbols
+N +V
+Sg +Du +Pl
+1Sg +2Sg +3Sg +4Sg +1Du +2Du +3Du +4Du +1Pl +2Pl +3Pl +4Pl
+1SgO +2SgO +3SgO +4SgO +1DuO +2DuO +3DuO +4DuO +1PlO +2PlO+3PlO +4PlO !Objects' persons
+Abs +Rel +Trm +Loc +Abl !cases
+Ind +Cau +InfReal +InfUnreal !Voiced is unrealized and voiceless is for ongoing or realized actions.


ch sr kh qh ł2 !digraphs plus ł2 for voiceless palatalized l
%> !morphemeborder
%TRUNC !truncation dummy
%CVCTRUNC !dummy for very long truncations
%VCTRUNC !dummy for long truncation
%FRIC !dummy for fricativizing stem-final consonants. Needed to avoid a general rule that also would affect unwantedly as in *aaġagu for aaqagu. The alternative would have been to postulate truncating flexives with a fricative first consonant (*aiviq -q +ġit) but that is hokus pokus
%C ! dummy for intermediate gemination
!%CLIT !dummy with clitics used in Kalaallisut. This far unused in ipk

@P.IV.ON@ !Flag - positive inquiry for intransitive wants IV suff
@P.TV.ON@ !Flag - positive inquiry for intransitive wants TV suff
@R.IV.ON@ !Flag - require test for intransitivity   gets IV suff
@R.TV.ON@ !Flag - positive inquiry for intransitive gets TV siff
@D.IV.ON@ !Flag - disallow test - delete string if unsaturated flag (
@D.TV.ON@ !Flag - disalloq test - delete string if unsaturated flag (=Verb was not transitive)


!************************************
!Derivational morphemes and clitics *
!************************************

+NIAQ +NIAŊIT +SAAĠE ! verb elaborating
+VIK ! nominalizers
+LU +GUUQ ! clitics


LEXICON Root
	Nouns ;
	prop ;
	pron ;
	Verbs ;
!About lexica and continuations. Instead of separate lexica for words that can only be sing or only plur and others for words that can take all numbers, this is a better solution: Normal nouns are tagged tp, tup etc. whereas specials are tagged with the continuation lexicon

LEXICON tp !aġnaq ere
	tp_sing ;
	tp_du ;
	tp_pl ;

LEXICON tp_sing !erre
	ObliqueCases_Sg ;
+N+Abs+Sg:	clit ;
+N+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCm	clit ;

LEXICON tp_du
+N+Abs+Du:%C%>k	clit ;
+N:%C%>k	ObliqueCases_Du ; 

LEXICON tp_pl
+N+Abs+Pl:%TRUNC%>t	clit ;
+N:%TRUNC%>t	ObliqueCases_Pl ; 


LEXICON tpt !aŋun:aŋute
+N+Abs+Sg:%CVCTRUNCn	clit ;
+N+Abs+Pl:%>t	clit ;
+N+Rel+Sg:%>m	clit ;
+N+Trm+Sg:%CVCTRUNCn%>mun	clit ;

LEXICON tup !aiviq
+N+Abs+Sg:	clit ;
+N+Abs+Pl:%>%FRICit	clit ;
+N+Trm+Sg:%>mun	clit ;
+N+Abl+Sg:%>miñ	clit ;

LEXICON tup- !seksrik
+N+Abs+Sg:	clit ;
+N+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCit	clit ;


LEXICON ObliqueCases_Sg
+Loc+Sg:%>mi	clit ;

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Du
+Loc+Du:%>ni	clit ;

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Pl
+Loc+Pl:%>ni	clit ;


! Proper nouns
LEXICON propmorph
+N:	clit ;

! Pronouns
LEXICON pronmorph
+N:	clit ;



! Verb morphology
! ===============

LEXICON verb_intr
@P.IV.ON@            verbalderivatives ;
+V+Ind+Prs:%>tu      indpersonaffix ;
+V+Ind+Prt:%>tua     indpersonaffix ;
+V+Inf+Real:%>łu     infpersonaffix ;
+V+Inf+Unreal:%>lu   infpersonaffix ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>man     clit ;

LEXICON verb_intr_vow
@P.IV.ON@            verbalderivatives ;
+V+Ind+Prs:%>ru      indpersonaffix ;
+V+Ind+Pst:%>rua     indpersonaffix ;
+V+Inf+Real:%>łu     infpersonaffix ;
+V+Inf+Unreal:%>lu   infpersonaffix ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>man     clit ;


LEXICON verb_tr
@P.TV.ON@            verbalderivatives ;
+V+Ind+Prs:%>      indpersonaffix_tv ; 
+V+Ind+Pst:%>     indpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+Inf+Real:%>     infpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+Inf+Unreal:%>   infpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>     clit ;

LEXICON verb_tr_vow
@P.TV.ON@            verbalderivatives ;
+V+Ind+Prs:%>      indpersonaffix_tv ; 
+V+Ind+Pst:%>     indpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+Inf+Real:%>     infpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+Inf+Unreal:%>   infpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>     clit ;

LEXICON indpersonaffix_tv
+3Sg+3SgO:%>gaa	clit ;

! Diskusjon, skal vekk.
!aqpat@P.IV.ON@%>niaq@R.IV.ON@%>tu%>q@D.IV.ON@ #
!aqpat@P.IV.ON@%>niaq@R.TV.ON@%>gaa@D.IV.ON@ #

LEXICON   infpersonaffix_tv 
+1Sg+2Sg: clit ;

LEXICON verbalderivatives  ! hundreds of derivatives in here
+NIAQ:%>niaq	 verbalderivatives_cont ; !isiq-niaq-tuq 
+NIAŊIT:%>niaŋit verbalderivatives_cont ;
+SAAĠE:%>saaġe	 verbalderivatives_cont_vow ;
+VIK:%>vik	 tup- ; 

LEXICON verbalderivatives_cont
@R.IV.ON@ verb_intr ;
@R.TV.ON@ verb_tr ;

LEXICON verbalderivatives_cont_vow
@R.IV.ON@ verb_intr_vow ;
@R.TV.ON@ verb_tr_vow ;


LEXICON indpersonaffix 
+1Sg:%>ŋa	clit ;
+2Sg:%>tin	clit ;
+3Sg:%>q	clit ; ! ruq ??
+1Du:%>guk	clit ;
+2Du:%>sik	clit ; ! tik
+3Du:%>k 	clit ; ! ruq ??
+1Pl:%>tut	clit ;
+2Pl:%>si	clit ;
+3Pl:%>t	clit ; ! r

LEXICON interrverbaffix
+1Sg:%>k	 clit ;
+2Sg:%>t   clit ; ! XXX rule for t/n alternation!
+3Sg:%>	 clit ; ! ruq ??
+1Du:%>nuk clit ;
+2Du:%>sik clit ; ! tik
+3Du:%>k 	clit ; 
+1Pl:%>sa	clit ;
+2Pl:%>si	clit ;
+3Pl:%>t	clit ; 

LEXICON infpersonaffix !NB Incorrect flexives. Basically just transferred from Kalaallisut
+1Sg:%>ŋa	clit ;
+2Sg:%>tin	clit ;
+4Sg:%>ni	clit ; ! ruq ??
+1Du:%>guk	clit ;
+2Du:%>sik	clit ; ! tik
+4Du:%>k 	clit ; ! ruq ??
+1Pl:%>tut	clit ;
+2Pl:%>si	clit ;
+4Pl:%>t	clit ; ! r


LEXICON clit
+GUUQ:%>guuq	f ;
+LU:%>lu	f ;
	        f ;

LEXICON f
@D.IV.ON@ # ;
@D.TV.ON@ # ;
